Oklahoma, session 2026, SB466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 180.62, as
amended by Section 3, Chapter 394, O.S.L. 2024 (19 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 180.62), is amended to read as follows:
Section 180.62. A. The basic salaries of county officers upon
which all salaries and future increases or decreases thereof shall
not be less than Nineteen Thousand Dollars ($19,000.00) per annum
nor shall they exceed Forty-nine Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($49,500.00) Seventy-four Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($74,500.00)
per annum, provided the basic salary for the sheriff, which shall be
no less than other salaries for county officers controlled by this
section, shall not be less than Forty-four Thousand Dollars
($44,000.00) per annum nor shall it exceed Seventy-four Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($74,500.00) per annum.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB466 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. The board of county commissioners, or if the county has
elected to come under the County Budget Act, the county budget board
members of the county, shall set the salaries for all elected county
officials within the limits allowed by law.
C. The annual salaries fixed by this act Section 180.58 et seq.
of this title shall be paid either monthly or twice a month, by
order of the board of county commissioners, for each month or
fraction thereof the incumbent lawfully occupies and holds title to
such office.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON LOCAL AND COUNTY GOVERNMENT
March 4, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED













SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB466 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)